Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.275

Administration of medications by employees not licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW—Requirements—Immunity from liability.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) Beginning July 1, 2014, a school district employee not licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW who is asked to administer medications or perform nursing services not previously recognized in law shall at the time he or she is asked to administer the medication or perform the nursing service file, without coercion by the employer, a voluntary written, current, and unexpired letter of intent stating the employee's willingness to administer the new medication or nursing service. It is understood that the letter of intent will expire if the conditions of acceptance are substantially changed. If a school employee who is not licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW chooses not to file a letter under this section, the employee is not subject to any employer reprisal or disciplinary action for refusing to file a letter.

(2) In the event a school employee provides the medication or service to a student in substantial compliance with (a) rules adopted by the *state nursing care quality assurance commission and the instructions of a registered nurse or **advanced registered nurse practitioner issued under such rules, and (b) written policies of the school district, then the employee, the employee's school district or school of employment, and the members of the governing board and chief administrator thereof are not liable in any criminal action or for civil damages in his or her individual, marital, governmental, corporate, or other capacity as a result of providing the medication or service.

(3) The board of directors shall designate a professional person licensed under chapter 18.71, 18.57, or 18.79 RCW as it applies to registered nurses and **advanced registered nurse practitioners to consult and coordinate with the student's parents and health care provider, and train and supervise the appropriate school district personnel in proper procedures to ensure a safe, therapeutic learning environment. School employees must receive the training provided under this subsection before they are authorized to deliver the service or medication. Such training must be provided, where necessary, on an ongoing basis to ensure that the proper procedures are not forgotten because the services or medication are delivered infrequently.

[2014 c 204 s 2.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) The reference to "nursing care quality assurance commission" was changed to "board of nursing" by 2023 c 123.

**(2) The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.